test/src/morphology/A-ceeures_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Adjective - čeeuˊres e-stem pöly: # Noun - full paradigm
     čeeuˊres+A+Sg+Nom: čeeuˊres
     čeeuˊres+A+Sg+Gen: čeurraz
     čeeuˊres+A+Sg+Acc: čeurraz
     čeeuˊres+A+Sg+Ill: čeurrsa
     čeeuˊres+A+Sg+Loc: čeurrsest
     čeeuˊres+A+Sg+Com: čeurrsin
     čeeuˊres+A+Ess: čeurrsen
     čeeuˊres+A+Par: čeurrsed
     čeeuˊres+A+Sg+Abe: čeurraztää
     čeeuˊres+A+Pl+Nom: čeurraz
     čeeuˊres+A+Pl+Gen: čeurrsi
     čeeuˊres+A+Pl+Acc: čeurrsid
     čeeuˊres+A+Pl+Ill: čeurrsid
     čeeuˊres+A+Pl+Loc: čeurrsin
     čeeuˊres+A+Pl+Com: čeurrsivuiˊm
     čeeuˊres+A+Pl+Abe: čeurrsitää
